Texas, session 892, HB95.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  SECTION 418.1015, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 418.1015.  EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT DIRECTORS.  (a)  The presiding officer of the governing body of an incorporated city or a county or the chief administrative officer of a joint board is designated as the emergency management director for the officer's political subdivision. (b)  An emergency management director serves as the governor's designated agent in the administration and supervision of duties under this chapter.  An emergency management director may exercise the powers granted to the governor under this chapter on an appropriate local scale. (c)  An emergency management director may designate a person to serve as emergency management coordinator.  The emergency management coordinator shall serve as an assistant to the emergency management director for emergency management purposes.  A person designated as an emergency management coordinator must meet minimum credentialing qualifications established by rule by the division. SECTION 2.  SECTION 418.005, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 418.005.  EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT TRAINING.  (a)  This section applies only to: (1)  an elected law enforcement officer or county judge, or an appointed public officer of the state or of a political subdivision, who has management or supervisory responsibilities and: (A)  whose position description, job duties, or assignment includes emergency management responsibilities; or (B)  who plays a role in emergency preparedness, response, or recovery; and (2)  an emergency management coordinator designated under Section 418.1015(c) by the emergency management director of a county with a population of 500,000 or more. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect immediately if this Act receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.